Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2183.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1513. End date of fixed-rate notice.(a) Notification required .-- A public utility, electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier that offers customers a fixed-rate option shall notify a customer, in plain understandable language as the commission shall prescribe, that the fixed-rate period is ending as prescribed under subsection (b). If the customer continues service, the public utility, electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier shall notify the customer that the fixed-rate period has ended. If the customer receives a monthly bill or interim statement or bill 1234567891011121314151617 under section 1509 (relating to billing procedures), the notice may be provided as a part of the bill or interim statement.(b) Notification schedule .-- The notice required under subsection (a) shall be provided to the customer by whichever method the public utility, electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier renders bills to the customer at least 60 days prior to the end date of the fixed-rate period. A second notice shall be provided at least 30 days prior to the end date of the fixed-rate period. If a customer continues service with the public utility, electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier after the fixed-rate period has ended, notice shall be provided to the customer that the fixed-rate period has ended at least once every 30 days for the first three months after the end date of the fixed-rate period.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electric generation supplier." As defined under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."Natural gas supplier." As defined under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2202 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2183PN2837 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122